District of Columbia statutes.
22-1808

Offenses committed beyond District.

Any person who by the commission outside of the District of Columbia of any act which, if committed within the District of Columbia, would be a criminal offense under the laws of said District, thereby obtains any property or other thing of value, and is afterwards found with any such property or other such thing of value in his or her possession in said District, or who brings any such property or other such thing of value into said District, shall, upon conviction, be punished in the same manner as if said act had been committed wholly within said District.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 836a
Dec. 21, 1911, 37 Stat. 45, ch. 2
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 2(c), 41 DCR 1639

History

Receiving stolen goods, see §§ 22-3231 and 22-3232.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 22-108.
1973 Ed., § 22-108.

Prior Codifications